Idaho, session 2025, S1218.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. TRANSPORTATION SERVICES:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $50,600 $355,600 $2,555,600 $2,961,800
B. CAPITAL FACILITIES:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $25,100,000 $25,100,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
C. AERONAUTICS:
FROM:
State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund $10,005,200 $27,100 $10,032,300
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund 0 4,000 4,000
TOTAL $10,005,200 $31,100 $10,036,300
DIVISION
TOTAL $50,600 $10,360,800 $27,686,700 $38,098,100
II. MOTOR VEHICLES:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $2,400 $847,700 $742,100 $1,592,200
III. HIGHWAY OPERATIONS:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $3,416,000 $2,030,400 $66,017,200 $71,463,600
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 1,047,000 $11,980,000 13,027,000
Federal COVID-19 Relief
Fund 0 0 0 565,000 565,000
TOTAL $3,416,000 $3,077,400 $66,017,200 $12,545,000 $85,055,600
IV. CONTRACT CONSTRUCTION & RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION:
FROM:
State Highway (Local)
Fund $5,000,000 $5,000,000
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 107,276,000 107,276,000
TOTAL $112,276,000 $112,276,000
GRANDTOTAL $3,469,000 $14,285,900 $206,722,000 $12,545,000 $237,021,900


SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
there is hereby reduced from the Idaho Transportation Department by the
following amounts from the designated programs for personnel costs from the
State Highway Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
ADMINISTRATION: $7,500
MOTOR VEHICLES: 2,400
HIGHWAY OPERATIONS: 92,000
TOTAL $101,900
SECTION 3. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE CAPITAL FACILITIES PRO-
GRAM. There is hereby reappropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department
any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated to the Idaho Trans-
portation Department from the State Aeronautics (Dedicated) Fund and the
State Highway (Dedicated) Fund in the Capital Facilities Program for fiscal
year 2025, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures in the Capital Facili-
ties Program for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund,
expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to
processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 4. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR AIRPORT DEVELOPMENT GRANTS.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department any
unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the
Idaho Transportation Department from the State Aeronautics (Dedicated) Fund
as trustee and benefit payments for airport development grants for fiscal
year 2025, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for airport development
grants for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the
State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense
class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing
the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 5. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE CONTRACT CONSTRUCTION
AND RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION DIVISION. There is hereby reappropriated to
the Idaho Transportation Department any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated or reappropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department
from the State Highway Fund and the Transportation Expansion and Congestion
Mitigation Fund for the Contract Construction and Right-of-Way Acquisition
Division for fiscal year 2025, in a total amount not to exceed $300,000,000
from the State Highway Fund and/or the Transportation Expansion and Con-
gestion Mitigation Fund, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for the
Contract Construction and Right-of-Way Acquisition Division for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall
confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program,
with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the reappropria-
tion authorized herein.


SECTION 6. CASH TRANSFER. There is hereby appropriated and the Office
of the State Controller shall transfer $165,000,000 from the General Fund to
the Strategic Initiatives Program (Dedicated) Fund as soon as practicable
for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 7. CASH TRANSFER. There is hereby appropriated and the Office
of the State Controller shall transfer $110,000,000 from the General Fund
to the Local Highway Distribution Fund as soon as practicable for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 8. LOCAL HIGHWAY DISTRIBUTION FUND. The amount appropriated in
Section 7 of this act shall be distributed in full with the first distribu-
tion from the Highway Distribution Account.
SECTION 9. AIRPORT DEVELOPMENT GRANT ELIGIBILITY. Airport development
grants shall not be allocated to airports in violation of the Policy on the
Non-Aeronautical Use of Airport Hangars, 81 F.R. 38906. Compliance with the
federal regulation will be confirmed by the airport sponsor and reported to
the Idaho Transportation Department prior to distribution of funds.
SECTION 10. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 11. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 329, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
CAPITAL BENEFIT
OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. HIGHWAY OPERATIONS:
FROM:
State Highway (Federal)
Fund $5,500,000 $5,500,000
II. CONTRACT CONSTRUCTION & RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION:
FROM:
State Highway (Local)
Fund $10,000,000 $10,000,000
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 50,000,000 50,000,000
TOTAL $60,000,000 $60,000,000


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
CAPITAL BENEFIT
OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
GRAND TOTAL $60,000,000 $5,500,000 $65,500,000
SECTION 12. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 11 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 10 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.